Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 7. Fees

§ 25-7-1.
Lawful to demand specific fees only.

It shall be lawful for the Clerk of the Supreme Court, the clerks of the circuit and chancery courts, the clerks of the justice court, masters and commissioners in chancery, sheriffs, constables, justice court judges, notaries public, and other officers and persons named in this chapter to demand, receive, and take the several fees hereinafter mentioned and allowed for any business by them respectively done by virtue of their several offices, and no more.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 439; 1892, § 1987; 1906, § 2163; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1844; 1930, § 1782; 1942, § 3928; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 47; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 25-7-3.
Clerk of the Supreme Court.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall charge the following fees:

General docket fee, for filing the record on appealin a civilor criminal case. . . . .$ 200.00

Miscellaneous docket fee. . . . . 50.00

Confidential miscellaneous docket fee. . . . . 200.00

Admission of new attorneys. . . . .30.00

Act of Congress certificate. . . . .25.00

Certificate of admission replacement. . . . .25.00

Certificate of good standing replacement. . . . .10.00

Attest stamp. . . . .5.00

Order from Minute Book. . . . .10.00

Regular copying. . . . ..50 per page

Copying from bound volumes or records. . . . . 2.00 per page

Copy of mandate. . . . . 10.00

Minimum copy charge . . . . .1.00

Notary fee. . . . .2.50

Decision list charge . . . . .5.00

Handling charge and retrieval and delivery charges on completed Supreme Court records (to be retained out of deposit)

On-site retrieval. . . . .10.00

Off-site retrieval. . . . .15.00

Forfeited deposits on completed Supreme Court records. . . . .100.00

Petition for rehearing . . . . .50.00

Said general docket fee shall be collected from the appellant by the clerk of the lower court and forwarded to the Clerk of the Supreme Court. The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall charge the maximum amount allowable by law for services rendered where charges for such services are provided by statute; for any other services rendered, the amount charged shall be consistent with the cost of providing such services. All fees shall be paid in the form of cash, cashier’s check, or money order or by a check on the account of an attorney payable to the Clerk of the Supreme Court. All fees authorized to be assessed and collected by the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be deposited into the State General Fund, except that One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the general docket fee set under paragraph (a), Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the miscellaneous docket fee set under paragraph (b), One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the confidential miscellaneous fee set under paragraph (c), Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) of the act of Congress certificate set under paragraph (e), Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the certificate of admission replacement set under paragraph (f), Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50) of the attest stamp set under paragraph (h), Five Dollars ($5.00) of the order from minute book set under paragraph (i), Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the copy of mandate set under paragraph (l), Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of the forfeited deposits on completed Supreme Court records set under paragraph (q), Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the petition for rehearing fee under paragraph (r), and the total amount charged for any other services rendered shall be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 440; 1892, § 1988; 1906, § 2164; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1845; 1930, § 1783; 1942, § 3929; Laws, 1978, ch 335, § 35; Laws, 1984, ch. 407; Laws, 1986, ch. 490; Laws, 1989, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-7-5.
Payment of fee for recording opinions.

The fees of the Clerk of the Supreme Court for recording opinions as required by law shall be payable semiannually out of the state treasury from the proper appropriation, on the certificate of either of the judges of the Supreme Court that the service has been well performed and that the account is true, correct, and just.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1413; 1892, § 1989; 1906, § 2165; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1846; 1930, § 1784; 1942, § 3930.

§ 25-7-7.
Fees due from state or county.

The clerk of the Supreme Court shall make out a separate, detailed account of fees adjudged against the state, in cases where the state fails in the prosecution or suit or in case of felony where the defendant appeals on pauper oath and the costs cannot be made out of his estate, or against any county, and due him in civil or criminal cases, keeping the fees in each case separate, and shall present it to the attorney general, who shall examine the fee bill in each case and approve it if found to be correct. The fee bill thus approved shall be presented to the supreme court for allowance. If the court allow the same, it shall direct in criminal cases that it be paid out of the county treasury of the county where the prosecution was begun, on the order of the board of supervisors thereof; and in civil cases, that it be paid out of the state or county treasury, as the case may be. The board of supervisors shall allow said claim for fees against the county on presentation of a duly certified copy of the judgment of the supreme court ordering the same to be paid; and the auditor shall issue a warrant, on the order of the supreme court, for such costs against the state in civil cases to be paid by the state treasurer out of the proper appropriation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 441; 1892, § 1990; 1906, § 2166; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1847; 1930, § 1785; 1942, § 3931.

§ 25-7-9.
Clerks of the chancery court.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The clerks of the chancery courts shall charge the following fees:

For the act of certifying copies of filed documents, for eachcomplete document. . . . .$ 1.00

Recording each deed, will, lease, amendment, subordination, lien, release, cancellation, order, decree, oath, etc., per book and page listed where applicable, each deed of trust, or any other document, for the first five (5) pages. . . . .$ 25.00

Each additional page. . . . .$ 1.00

(i) Recording oil and gas leases, cancellations, etc., including indexing in general indices; for the first fifteen (15) pages . . . . .$18.00

Each additional page. . . . . $ 1.00

Sectional index entries per section or subdivision lot. . . . .$ 1.00

Recording each oil and gas assignmentper assignee per each book and page listed. . . . .$ 18.00

(i) Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file:

If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page. . . . .$ .50

If performed by any other person,. . . . .$ .25

Entering marginal notations on documents of record. . . . . . . .. . . . .$ 1.00

For each day’s attendance on the board of supervisors, for himself and one (1) deputy, each. . . . .$ 20.00

For other services as clerk of the board of supervisors an allowance shall be made to him (payable semiannually at the July and January meetings) out of the county treasury,an annual sum not exceeding. . . . .$ 3,000.00

For each day’s attendance on the chancery court, to be approved by the chancellor: For the first chancellor sitting only, clerk and two (2) deputies, each. . . . .$ 85.00

For the second chancellor sitting, clerk only. . . . .$ 85.00

Provided that the fees herein prescribed shall be the total remuneration for the clerk and his deputies for attending chancery court.

On order of the court, clerks and not more than two (2) deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for each term of court for attendance upon the court to get up records.

For public service not otherwise specifically provided for, the chancery court may by order allow the clerk to be paid by the county on the order of the board of supervisors, an annual sum not exceeding . . . . . $ 5,000.00

For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund . . . . .$ 5.00

The chancery clerk shall itemize on the original document a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing, recording and abstracting same. No person shall be required to pay such fees until same have been so itemized, but those fees may be demanded before the document is recorded.

The following fee shall be a total fee for all services performed by the clerk with respect to any civil case filed that includes, but is not limited to, divorce, alteration of birth or marriage certificate, removal of minority, guardianship or conservatorship, estate of deceased, adoption, land dispute injunction, settlement of small claim, contempt, modification, partition suit, or commitment, which shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the chancery clerk at the time of filing. The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth without additional compensation or fee. . . . .$ 85.00

For every civil case filed:

An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14 . . . . .$ 10.00

An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45 . . . . .$ 40.00

Cost of process shall be borne by the issuing party. Additionally, should the attorney or person filing the pleadings desire the clerk to pay the cost to the sheriff for serving process on one (1) person or more, or to pay the cost of publication, the clerk shall demand the actual charges therefor, at the time of filing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 442; 1892, § 1991; 1906, § 2167; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1848; 1930, §§ 1786, 1804; 1942, §§ 3932, 3952; Laws, 1928, chs. 87, 227; Laws, 1940, ch. 230; Laws, 1950, ch. 291; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 65; Laws, 1970, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 10; Laws, 2005, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 573, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-7-10.
Additional allowance for chancery court clerks in certain counties.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts and having a regularly appointed deputy chancery court clerk, the chancery court clerk may be allowed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month. This amount may be allowed and paid monthly to the chancery court clerk by the board of supervisors of each county affected by this section out of the general fund of the county and may be in addition to all other allowances not provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 583, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1998.

§ 25-7-11.
Recording fees itemized.

The chancery clerk shall itemize on the record, following the instrument recorded by him, a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing and recording same. A fee bill shall not be allowed him for a receipt given for the deed or other instrument unless the same shall be demanded, and such fee shall not be due until the clerk shall have complied with all the provisions of the law on the subject of the record of instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1992; 1906, § 2168; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1849; 1930, § 1787; 1942, § 3933.

§ 25-7-13.
Clerks of the circuit court.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section shall read as follows:]

The clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees:

Docketing, filing, marking and registering eachcomplaint, petition and indictment. . . . .$ 85.00

The fee set forth in this paragraph shall be the total fee for all services performed by the clerk up to and including entry of judgment with respect to each complaint, petition or indictment, including all answers, claims, orders, continuances and other papers filed therein, issuing each writ, summons, subpoena or other such instruments, swearing witnesses, taking and recording bonds and pleas, and recording judgments, orders, fiats and certificates; the fee shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the clerk at the time of collection. The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth above without additional compensation or fee.

Docketing and filing each motion to renew judgment,notice of renewal of judgment, suggestion for a writ of garnishment,suggestion for a writ of execution and judgment debtor actions andissuing all process, filing and recording orders or other papers andswearing witnesses. . . . .$ 35.00

For every civil case filed, an additional fee to be depositedto the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court SystemsFund established in Section 9-21-14 . . . . .$ 10.00

For every civil case filed, an additional fee to bedeposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fundestablished in Section 9-21-45 . . . . .$ 40.00

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees:

Filing and marking each order or other paper andrecording and indexing same. . . . .$ 2.00

Issuing each writ, summons, subpoena, citation,capias and other such instruments. . . . .$ 1.00

Administering an oath and taking bond. . . . .$ 2.00

Certifying copies of filed documents, for each

complete document. . . . .$ 1.00

Recording orders, fiats, licenses, certificates, oaths and bonds:

First page. . . . .$ 2.00

Each additional page. . . . .$ 1.00

Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file and entering marginal notations on documents of record:

If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page. . . . .$1.00

If performed by any other person, per page. . . . .$.25

Judgment roll entry. . . . .$ 5.00

Taxing cost and certificate. . . . .$ 1.00

For taking and recording application for marriage license,for filing and recording consent of parents when required by law, forfiling and recording medical certificate, filing and recording proof ofage, recording and issuing license, recording and filing returns. . . . .$35.00

The clerk shall deposit Fourteen Dollars ($14.00) of each fee collected for a marriage license in the Victims of Domestic Violence Fund established in Section 93-21-117, on a monthly basis.

For certified copy of marriage license and search of record, the same fee charged by the Bureau of Vital Statistics of the State Board of Health.

For public service not particularly provided for, thecircuit court may allow the clerk, per annum, to be paid by thecounty on presentation of the circuit court’s order, the followingamount. . . . .$5,000.00

However, in the counties having two (2) judicial districts, such above allowance shall be made for each judicial district.

For drawing jurors and issuing venire, to be paid by the

county. . . . .$ 5.00

For each day’s attendance upon the circuit court term,for himself and necessary deputies allowed by the court, each tobe paid by the county. . . . .$75.00

Summons, each juror to be paid by the county upon theallowance of the court. . . . .$ 1.00

For issuing each grand jury subpoena, to be paid bythe county on allowance by the court, not to exceed Twenty-fiveDollars ($25.00) in any one (1) term of court. . . . .$ 1.00

For each civil filing, to be deposited into the CivilLegal Assistance Fund. . . . .$ 5.00

On order of the court, clerks and deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for attendance upon the court to get up records.

The clerk’s fees in state cases where the state fails in the prosecution, or in cases of felony where the defendant is convicted and the cost cannot be made out of his estate, in an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) in one (1) year, shall be paid out of the county treasury on approval of the circuit court, and the allowance thereof by the board of supervisors of the county. In counties having two (2) judicial districts, such allowance shall be made in each judicial district; however, the maximum thereof shall not exceed Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00). Clerks in the circuit court, in cases where appeals are taken in criminal cases and no appeal bond is filed, shall be allowed by the board of supervisors of the county after approval of their accounts by the circuit court, in addition to the above fees, for making such transcript the rate of Two Dollars ($2.00) per page.

The clerk of the circuit court may retain as his commission on all money coming into his hands, by law or order of the court, a sum to be fixed by the court not exceeding one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) on all such sums.

For making final records required by law, including, but not limited to, circuit and county court minutes, and furnishing transcripts of records, the circuit clerk shall charge Two Dollars ($2.00) per page. The same fees shall be allowed to all officers for making and certifying copies of records or papers which they are authorized to copy and certify.

The circuit clerk shall prepare an itemized statement of fees for services performed, cost incurred, or for furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file, and shall submit the statement to the parties or, if represented, to their attorneys within sixty (60) days. A bill for same shall accompany the statement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 443; 1892, § 1993; 1906, § 2169; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1850; 1930, §§ 1788, 1804; 1942, §§ 3934, 3952; Laws, 1928, chs. 87, 227; Laws, 1938, ch. 292; Laws, 1940, ch. 230; Laws, 1948, ch. 237; Laws, 1950, ch. 239; Laws, 1958, ch. 330; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 65; Laws, 1968, ch. 398, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 461, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 481, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 9; Laws, 2006, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 573, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 577, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2019, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-7-14.
Prepayment of chancery or circuit court fees by state or political subdivision.

Neither the state, nor any county, city, town, or village, nor any state board, nor any state, county, city, town, or village officer, in his official character, may be required to prepay the cost of filing a document or an instrument with, or obtaining a copy of any filed document or instrument obtained from, the office of the chancery or circuit clerk. If the cost for filing a document or an instrument or obtaining a copy of a document or instrument is not paid at the time of filing or obtaining a copy of the document or instrument, then the clerk shall furnish an itemized statement and payment shall be paid in the same manner as other claims are paid by the governing body or official having authority to pay claims against the governing body.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 25-7-15.
Allowances for deputy circuit court clerks.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts and having a regularly appointed deputy circuit court clerk who shall serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the circuit court clerk resides, the circuit court clerk shall be allowed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month. This amount shall be allowed and paid monthly to the circuit court clerk by the board of supervisors of each county affected by this section out of the general fund of the county and shall be in addition to all other allowances now provided by law.

The boards of supervisors of every county shall pay to the circuit clerk the sum of Seven Hundred Dollars ($700.00) for each session of the grand jury for preparing the grand jury docket, subpoenas, calendar and related services.

The circuit clerks of every county having an assessed valuation in excess of Sixty-five Million Dollars ($65,000,000.00) at the last federal census and having located therein two (2) municipalities with population in excess of thirty thousand (30,000) respectively at the last federal census and bordering on the Gulf of Mexico, of every county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and the State of Alabama, and of counties having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) according to the federal census of 1960, and any county with a population in excess of sixty-five thousand (65,000) at the last federal census of 1970 and having an assessed valuation in excess of One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00) according to the 1975 assessment, shall receive a sum of not less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) annually for employment of deputies whose duties are devoted substantially to registration of voters. The sum shall be payable monthly out of any available funds in the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3934.5, 3934.7; Laws, 1952, ch. 219, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 262, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1964, ch. 511; Laws, 1966, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 330; Laws, 1977, ch. 385; Laws, 1994, ch. 643, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 500, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1997.

§ 25-7-17.
Fees of circuit clerks in certain municipal appeals.

The clerk of the circuit court of any county in Mississippi in which is located a municipality with a population of seventy-five hundred (7,500) or more, according to the last federal census, may be allowed an amount not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for any one year to be paid out of the municipal treasury of said municipality on the filing of an itemized account of fees in each special case appealed from any city, where said case is disposed of by nolle prosequi, passed to files, or verdict of not guilty. Said fee bills shall be approved by the city attorney for payment and shall be presented to the municipal council or board of aldermen of said municipality for allowance, in the discretion of said council or board. This section shall not apply to counties wherein is located a municipality of less than ten thousand (10,000) and more than seventy-five hundred (7,500) population, in which said county there has been created and maintained a county court under Chapter 9, Title 9, of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3935; Laws, 1940, ch. 274; Laws, 1942, ch. 228.

§ 25-7-19.
Sheriffs.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The sheriffs of the various counties of the State of Mississippi shall charge the following fees:

A uniform total fee in all criminal and civil cases for the service or attempted service of any process, summons, warrant, writ or other notice as may be required by law or the court, each. . . . . $ 45.00

In all cases where there is more than one (1) defendant residing at the same household, service on each additional defendant. . . . .$ 5.00

After final judgment has been enrolled, notice of further proceedings involving levy of execution on judgments, and attachment and garnishment proceedings, shall be deemed a new suit and the sheriff shall be entitled to the following fee. . . . .$ 45.00

Taking bonds of every kind (for purposes of this fee multiple bonds for criminal charges arising out of a single incident or transaction shall be considered a single bond). . . . .$ 25.00

Attendance in habeas corpus proceeding in vacation, eminent domain court and commitment cases. . . . .$ 25.00

On all money made by virtue of any decree, execution or attachment, or other process, the following commissions, to wit:

On the first One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), five percent (5%),

On the second One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), four percent (4%),

On all sums over Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), three percent (3%).

For all service of all process of every kind and nature issued from without the county wherein it is to be served, a fee of. . . . .$ 45.00

In civil cases, all process sent out of the county, where issued to another county for service, shall be accompanied by a fee of Forty-five Dollars ($45.00) to pay the sheriff’s fee for his execution of such process unless the clerk or justice shall endorse on the process that the party at whose instance it issued had filed an affidavit of inability to pay costs thereof. All fees sent and unearned, and the whole of it, shall be unearned if the writ be not legally and properly executed and returned, and shall be remitted by the sheriff with the writ at his own expense.

The sheriff shall keep a complete account of every fee of every nature, commission or charge collected by him, and shall file an itemized statement thereof monthly, under oath, with the clerk of the board of supervisors of his county who shall preserve same as a part of the records of his office, and he shall make a remittance to the clerk of the board of supervisors of his county on or before the fifteenth of each month for deposit into the general fund of the county of all said fees, commissions and charges collected during the preceding month. A fee for attempted service of process is unearned absent two (2) documented actual attempts to serve the process.

At least Ten Dollars ($10.00) from each fee collected and deposited into the county’s general fund under the provisions of paragraphs (a), (c) and (g) of subsection (1) of this section shall be used for the sheriffs’ salaries authorized in Section 25-3-25, as such Ten Dollar ($10.00) amount was authorized during the 2007 Regular Session in Chapter 331, Laws of 2007, for the purpose of providing additional monies to the counties for sheriffs’ salaries.

Any sheriff who shall knowingly fail to collect any fee established by law which was in fact collectible by him or having collected the fee shall fail to keep account of such fee or fail to deposit the fee with the clerk of the board of supervisors as provided by subsection (2), or such other person or office entitled thereto, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor in office and, upon conviction therefor, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed double the amount he failed to collect or pay over, or imprisoned for not to exceed six (6) months in the county jail, or be punished by both such fine and imprisonment.

This provision shall in no way lessen the sheriff’s civil liability on his bond, but shall be an additional penalty for misfeasance or nonfeasance in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 444; 1892, § 1994; 1906, § 2170; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1857; 1930, § 1789; 1942, §§ 3936, 3936.5; Laws, 1928, Ex ch. 17; Laws, 1930, ch. 119; Laws, 1932, ch. 201; Laws, 1938, Ex ch. 24; Laws, 1944, chs. 179, 320, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 250; Laws, 1952, ch. 217; Laws, 1958, chs. 321, 327; Laws, 1960, chs. 330, 331; Laws, 1964, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 324; Laws, 1977, ch. 442; Laws, 1980, ch. 455; Laws, 1993, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-7-21.
Tax collectors.

From and after October 1, 1985, there will be no fees for the services of the tax collector, with the exception of taxes collected for taxing authorities other than the board of supervisors. For collecting taxes for authorities other than the board of supervisors, the fee shall be five percent (5%) of the taxes collected or an amount authorized by contract between the county and the outside taxing authority. A tax collector shall keep a complete account of every such fee collected and shall file an itemized statement thereof monthly, under oath, with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county who shall preserve same as a part of the records of the office. The tax collector shall make a remittance to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county on or before the twentieth of each month for deposit into the general fund of the county of all said fees collected during the preceding month.

For the purpose of the limitations set forth in Section 27-39-321, commissions for levies set by the board of supervisors shall be added to base collections of the general county fund for the 1984-1985 year only.

Fees of publisher for publication – To the publishers, payable by the delinquent taxpayer, and to be collected and paid over by the tax collectors; or if the land be sold to the state to be paid by the state:

For each separate publication advertising lands for sale for taxes, for each separately described subdivision, as described and set out in the assessment rolls for the county. . . . .$ 1.50

Fees of chancery clerk for collection of delinquent taxes:

For abstracting the list of lands sold for taxes, for each separately described section or subdivision lot. . . . .$ 1.00

For filing and recording deed to land sold for taxes. . . . .$10.00

For abstracting each deed in the sectional index, per section or subdivision lot. . . . .$ 1.00

For recording redemption of each. . . . .$10.00

For abstracting each redemption in the sectional index, per section or subdivision lot. . . . .$ 1.00

And, in addition, three percent (3%) on the amount necessary to redeem.

The several officers’ fees shall be collected by the tax collector or chancery clerk and paid over to those entitled to same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 444; 1892, § 1994; 1906, § 2170; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1857; 1930, § 1789; 1942, § 3936; Laws, 1928, Ex ch. 17; Laws, 1930, ch. 119; Laws, 1932, ch. 201; Laws, 1938, Ex ch. 24; Laws, 1944, chs. 179, 320, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 250; Laws, 1952, ch. 217; Laws, 1958, chs. 321, 327; Laws, 1960, chs. 330, 331; Laws, 1964, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 386; Laws, 1985, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 364, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-7-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

[Codes, 1880, § 449; 1892, § 2005; 1906, § 2181; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1862; 1930, § 1791; 1942, § 3939; Laws, 1958, ch. 324, § 1; 1968, ch. 425, § 1; 1974, ch. 427]

§ 25-7-25.
Justice courts.

Costs and fees in the justice court shall be charged as follows and shall be paid in advance to the clerk of the justice court in accordance with the provisions of Section 9-11-10:

A uniform total fee in all civil cases, whether contested or uncontested, which shall include all services in connection therewith, except as hereinafter stated, each. . . . .$25.00

For more than one (1) defendant, for service of process on each defendant. . . . .5.00

After final judgment has been enrolled, further proceedings involving levy of execution on judgments, and attachment and garnishment proceedings. . . . .15.00

For all services in connection with the issuance of a peace

bond. . . . .25.00

For celebrating a marriage, and certificate thereof. . . . .10.00

Commission to take depositions. . . . .5.00

Appeal with proceedings and bond. . . . .5.00

A clerk’s fee to be collected in all criminal cases in which the defendant is convicted, as follows:

For all violations in Title 63 other than driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor or reckless driving. . . . .5.00

All other criminal cases. . . . .25.00

The justice court shall have the power to impose a fee not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for an expungement or dismissal of any criminal affidavit, complaint or charge.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of Section 25-3-36, each justice court judge may receive a fee of not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each marriage ceremony he performs in the courtroom or offices of the justice court at any time the courtroom or offices are open to the public. This fee shall be paid by the parties to the marriage. Each justice court judge may receive money or gratuities for marriage ceremonies performed outside of and away from the courtroom and the offices of the justice court, that the parties to the marriage request to have performed at any time the courtroom or offices of the justice court are closed. These monies or gratuities, in an amount agreed upon by the parties to the marriage, are not considered fees for the justice court and are not subject to the requirements set forth in the provisions of Section 9-11-10.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 450; 1892, § 2006; 1906, § 2182; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1863; 1930, § 1792; 1942, § 3940; Laws, 1922, ch. 165; Laws, 1944, ch. 185; Laws, 1952, ch. 242, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 340; Laws, 1966, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 409; Laws, 1978, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 440, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 25-7-27.
Marshals and constables.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

Marshals and constables shall charge the following fees:

(i) In all civil and criminal cases, for each service of process, summons, warrant, writ or other notice. . . . .$45.00

In all cases where there is more than one (1) defendant residing at the same household, for service on each additional defendant. . . . .$ 5.00

For service of each process of every kind and nature issued from outside the county where it is to be served, the fees provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph, as applicable, shall be assessed.

When a complaining party has provided erroneous information to the clerk of the court relating to the service of process on the defendant or defendants and process cannot be served after diligent search and inquiry on oath thereof of the marshal or constable, as the case may be, charged with serving such process, the fees provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph, as applicable, shall be assessed.

When process has been attempted in one (1) county but the defendant is not found, and process must be served on that defendant in another county, the clerk shall notify the complaining party that an additional fee or fees must be paid before the process can be delivered to the other county.

After final judgment has been enrolled, further proceedings involving levy of execution on judgments, and attachment and garnishment proceedings shall be a new suit for which the marshal or constable shall be entitled to the following fee. . . . .$45.00

For conveying a person charged with a crime to jail, mileage reimbursement in an amount not to exceed the rate established under Section 25-3-41(2).

To be paid out of the county treasury on the allowance of the board of supervisors, when the state fails in the prosecution, or the person is convicted but is not able to pay the costs.

For other service, the same fees allowed sheriffs for similar services.

For service as a bailiff in any court in a civil case, to be paid by the county on allowance of the court on issuance of a warrant therefor, an amount equal to the amount provided under Section 19-25-31 for each day, or part thereof, for which he serves as bailiff when the court is in session.

For serving all warrants and other process and attending all trials in state cases in which the state fails in the prosecution, to be paid out of the county treasury on the allowance of the board of supervisors without itemization, subject, however, to the condition that the marshal or constable must not have overcharged in the collection of fees for costs, contrary to the provisions of this section, annually. . . . .$2,500.00

Marshals and constables shall be paid all uncollected fees levied under subsection (1) of this section in full from the first proceeds received by the court from the guilty party or from any other source of payment in connection with the case.

In addition to the fees authorized to be paid to a constable under subsection (1) of this section, a constable may receive payments for collecting delinquent criminal fines in justice court pursuant to the provisions of Section 19-3-41(3).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 452; 1892, § 2008; 1906, § 2184; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1865; 1930, § 1793; 1942, § 3941; Laws, 1920, ch. 132; Laws, 1944, ch. 186; Laws, 1946, ch. 406; Laws, 1952, ch. 243; Laws, 1958, ch. 323; Laws, 1972, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 377; Laws, 1978, ch. 333, § 1, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 441, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 31; Laws, 1987; ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 516, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 331, § 2, eff June 15, 2007 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section); Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-7-29.
Notaries public.

Notaries public may charge a fee in an amount of not less than Two Dollars ($2.00) nor more than Five Dollars ($5.00) for services rendered, including the performance of any of the following duties:

Protesting bill or note for nonacceptance or nonpayment, and giving notice;

Registering such protest and making record;

Attesting letters of attorney and seal;

Notarial affidavit to an account or other writing and seal;

Each oath or affirmation and seal;

Notarial procuration and seal;

Certifying sales at auction and seal;

Taking proof of debts to be sent abroad;

Protest in insurance cases and seal;

Copy of record and affidavit; or

Absentee ballot applications and ballots.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 451; 1892, § 2007; 1906, § 2183; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1864; 1930, § 1794; 1942, § 3942; Laws, 1996, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 25-7-31.
Officers taking depositions.

Officers taking depositions shall charge the following fees:

For administering oath, and certificate of the same. . . . .$ .50

For writing or copying the deposition, if required to do

so, for each hundred words. . . . . .10

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 455; 1892, § 2010; 1906, § 2186; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1867, 1930, § 1796; 1942, § 3944.

§ 25-7-33.
Officers taking acknowledgments.

For taking proof or acknowledgment of any writing concerning real

or personal estate, and certificate thereof for each party, the same

fee to all officers for the same service. . . . .$ .25

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 450; 1892, § 2011; 1906, § 2187; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1868; 1930, § 1797; 1942, § 3945.

§ 25-7-35.
Commissioners, referees, auditors, and arbitrators.

The court in which the cause is pending, or the chancellor or judge thereof in vacation, shall fix and allow reasonable compensation for commissioners, referees, auditors, and arbitrators; and such compensation shall be taxed and collected as costs in the suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 453, 456; 1892, §§ 2009, 2012; 1906, §§ 2185, 2188; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 1866, 1869; 1930, §§ 1795, 1798; 1942, §§ 3943, 3946; Laws, 1958, chs. 325, 328, 334, 337, 338, 344, 354; Laws, 1960, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3, eff July 1, 1960.

§ 25-7-37.
County surveyors.

The fees charged by a county surveyor shall be those fees agreed to between the county surveyor and the party engaging his or her services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 457; 1892, § 2013; 1906, § 2189; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1870; 1930, § 1799; 1942, § 3947; Laws, 1920, ch. 130; Laws, 1950, ch. 235; Laws, 2016, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.